Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB92.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2506(b) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2506. Drug delivery resulting in death.* * *(b) Penalty.--(1) A person convicted under subsection (a) shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment which shall be fixed by the court at not more than 40 years.(1.1) A person convicted under subsection (a) shall be sentenced to a minimum term of at least 10 years of total confinement and a fine of either $15,000 or a greater amount that equals the value of the assets utilized in and proceeds from the illegal activity if:12345678910111213141516171819 (i) prior to the commission of the offense, the person had two or more prior convictions for a violation of section 13(a)(14) or (30) of the Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act; and(ii) the person received anything of more than de minimis value, directly or indirectly, as consideration for dispensing, delivering, giving, prescribing, selling or distributing the controlled substance or counterfeit controlled substance.[(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to a person convicted under section 2502(c) (relating to murder) when the victim is less than 13 years of age and the conduct arises out of the same criminal act.](3) Paragraph (1.1) shall not apply:(i) to a person convicted under section 2502(c) when the victim is less than 13 years of age and the conduct arises out of the same criminal act;(ii) (I) if the person and the decedent intended to use the controlled substance or counterfeit controlled substance together; or(iii) (II) if the person used the controlled substance or counterfeit controlled substance with the decedent . * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0092PN0472 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425